test/src/gt-norm-yamls/A-tjaoskes_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Adjektiv - tjåskes: # 
    tjåskes+A+Attr: tjåskes

    tjåskes+A+Sg+Nom: tjåskes
    tjåskes+A+Pl+Nom: tjåsskása

#    tjåskes+A+Sg+Gen: tjåsskása
#    tjåskes+A+Sg+Acc: tjåsskásav
#    tjåskes+A+Sg+Ill: tjåsskásij
#    tjåskes+A+Sg+Ine: tjåsskásin
#    tjåskes+A+Sg+Ela: [tjåsskásist, tjåsskásis]
#    tjåskes+A+Sg+Com: tjåsskásijn
#    tjåskes+A+Pl+Gen: tjåsskásij
#    tjåskes+A+Pl+Acc: tjåsskásijd
#    tjåskes+A+Pl+Ill: tjåsskásijda
#    tjåskes+A+Pl+Ine: tjåsskásijn
#    tjåskes+A+Pl+Ela: [tjåsskásijst, tjåsskásijs]
#    tjåskes+A+Pl+Com: [tjåsskásij, tjåsskásijgum]
##    tjåskes+A+Ess: tjåsskásan

    tjåskes+A+Comp+Attr: tjåsskásup

    tjåskes+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: tjåsskásup
    tjåskes+A+Comp+Pl+Nom: [tjåsskásubo, tjåsskásuba]

#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Sg+Gen: tjåsskásubo
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Sg+Acc: tjåsskásubov
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Sg+Ill: tjåsskásuboj
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Sg+Ine: tjåsskásubon
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Sg+Ela: [tjåsskásubost, tjåsskásubos]
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Sg+Com: [tjåsskásubojn, tjåsskásubojna]
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Pl+Gen: tjåsskásuboj
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Pl+Acc: tjåsskásubojd
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Pl+Ill: tjåsskásubojda
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Pl+Ine: tjåsskásubojn
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Pl+Ela: [tjåsskásubojst, tjåsskásubojs]
#    tjåskes+A+Comp+Pl+Com: [tjåsskásuboj, tjåsskásubojgum]
##    tjåskes+A+Comp+Ess: tjåsskásubon

    tjåskes+A+Superl+Attr: tjåsskásumos

    tjåskes+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: tjåsskásumos
    tjåskes+A+Superl+Pl+Nom: tjåsskásubmusa

#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Sg+Gen: tjåsskásubmusa
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Sg+Acc: tjåsskásubmusav
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Sg+Ill: tjåsskásubmusij
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Sg+Ine: tjåsskásubmusin
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Sg+Ela: [tjåsskásubmusist, tjåsskásubmusis]
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Sg+Com: tjåsskásubmusijn
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Pl+Gen: tjåsskásubmusij
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Pl+Acc: tjåsskásubmusijd
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Pl+Ill: tjåsskásubmusijda
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Pl+Ine: tjåsskásubmusijn
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Pl+Ela: [tjåsskásubmusijst, tjåsskásubmusijs]
#    tjåskes+A+Superl+Pl+Com: [tjåsskásubmusij, tjåsskásubmusijgum]
##    tjåskes+A+Superl+Ess: tjåsskásubmusan
